Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.350

Nonresident pharmacies—Findings.

(1) The legislature finds and declares that the practice of pharmacy is a dynamic, patient-oriented health service that applies a scientific body of knowledge to improve and promote patient health by means of appropriate drug use and drug-related therapy.

(2) The legislature recognizes that with the proliferation of alternate methods of health delivery, there has arisen among third-party payors and insurance companies the desire to control the cost and utilization of pharmacy services through a variety of mechanisms, including the use of mail order pharmacies located outside the state of Washington.

(3) As a result, the legislature finds and declares that to continue to protect the Washington consumer-patient, all out-of-state pharmacies, including those located in Canada, that provide services to Washington residents shall be licensed by the department of health, disclose specific information about their services, and provide pharmacy services at a high level of protection and competence.

[ 2005 c 275 s 2; 1991 c 87 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 275: "The legislature finds that as consumers' prescription drug costs continue to rise, people across the state of Washington are exercising the option to purchase prescription drugs from Canada for their personal use. The state has a strong interest in the safety of drugs purchased through this mechanism. To address this interest, the legislature intends to authorize the *state board of pharmacy to regulate nonresident Canadian pharmacies." [ 2005 c 275 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: Chapter 19, Laws of 2013 changed "state board of pharmacy" to "pharmacy quality assurance commission."

Effective date—1991 c 87: "This act shall take effect October 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 87 s 15.]